Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20259-1101
Act, how cited.

Sections 9-1101 to 9-1118 and 9-1201 to 9-1209 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act.

Initiative Law 2020, No. 430, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 27;

Laws 2022, LB876, § 14;

Laws 2025, LB357, § 13.